Colorado, session 2026A, HB1431.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-20-202, amend
(3)(b)(I) introductory portion as follows:
12-20-202. Licenses, certifications, and registrations - renewal
- reinstatement - fees - occupational credential portability program -
exceptions for military personnel, spouses, gold star military spouses,
and dependents - rules - consideration of criminal convictions or
driver's history - executive director authority - definitions.
(3) Occupational credential portability program - definitions.
(b) (I) Except as specified in subsections (3)(c) and (3)(f) of this
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

section, a person AN INDIVIDUAL duly licensed, certified, registered, or
enrolled in good standing in another state, or A United States territory, OR
ANOTHER COUNTRY or through the federal government to practice a
particular profession or occupation, or who holds a military occupational
specialty, as defined in section 24-4-201, is, upon application to the division
for licensure, certification, registration, or enrollment in that profession or
occupation in this state, entitled to the issuance of the applicable license,
certification, registration, or enrollment if all of the following apply:
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3)
of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or
part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will
not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be
held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1431

(2) This act applies to applications for certification, registration, or
licensure by endorsement filed on or after the applicable effective date of
this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1431